SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SFX O Y 18
SFX O я йи я
SFX O я йин я
SFX O я йине я
SFX O я йинче я
SFX O я йипе я
SFX O я йисĕр я
SFX O я йисем/P я
SFX O я йишĕн я
SFX O я йăсем/P я
SFX O я йăн я
SFX O я йăна я
SFX O я йăра я
SFX O я йăран я
SFX O я йăпа я
SFX O я йăпалан я
SFX O я йăсăр я
SFX O я йăшăн я
SFX O я йăри я

SFX V Y 136
SFX V 0 етĕп .
SFX V р местĕп .
SFX V 0 етĕн .
SFX V р местĕн .
SFX V 0 ет .
SFX V р мест .
SFX V 0 етпĕр .
SFX V р местпĕр .
SFX V 0 етĕр .
SFX V р местĕр .
SFX V 0 еççĕ .
SFX V р меççĕ .
SFX V 0 еетĕп .
SFX V 0 ейместĕп .
SFX V 0 еетĕн .
SFX V 0 ейместĕн .
SFX V 0 еет .
SFX V 0 еймест .
SFX V 0 еетпĕр .
SFX V 0 ейместпĕр .
SFX V 0 еетĕр .
SFX V 0 ейместĕр .
SFX V 0 ееççĕ .
SFX V 0 еймеççĕ .
SFX V 0 ĕп .
SFX V р мĕп .
SFX V 0 ĕн .
SFX V р мĕн .
SFX V 0 ĕ .
SFX V р мĕ . 
SFX V 0 ĕпĕр .
SFX V р мĕпĕр .
SFX V 0 ĕр .
SFX V р мĕр .
SFX V 0 ĕç .
SFX V р мĕç .
SFX V р тĕм .
SFX V р мерĕм .
SFX V р тĕн .
SFX V р мерĕн .
SFX V р чĕ .
SFX V р мерĕ .
SFX V р тĕмĕр .
SFX V р мерĕмĕр .
SFX V р тĕр .
SFX V р мерĕр .
SFX V р чĕç .
SFX V р мерĕç .
SFX V 0 еттĕм .
SFX V 0 еттĕмччĕ .
SFX V р местĕмччĕ .
SFX V р местĕм .
SFX V 0 еттĕн .
SFX V 0 еттĕнччĕ .
SFX V р местĕнччĕ .
SFX V р местĕн .
SFX V 0 етчĕ .
SFX V р местчĕ .
SFX V 0 еттĕмĕр .
SFX V р еттĕмĕрччĕ .
SFX V р местĕмĕрччĕ .
SFX V р местĕмĕр .
SFX V 0 еттĕр .
SFX V 0 еттĕрччĕ .
SFX V р местĕрччĕ .
SFX V р местĕр .
SFX V 0 етчĕç .
SFX V р местчĕç .
SFX V 0 сеттĕм .
SFX V 0 сеттĕмччĕ .
SFX V 0 сеттĕн .
SFX V 0 сеттĕнччĕ .
SFX V 0 сеччĕ .
SFX V 0 сеттĕмĕр .
SFX V 0 сеттĕмĕрччĕ .
SFX V 0 сеттĕр .
SFX V 0 сеттĕрччĕ .
SFX V 0 сеччĕç .
SFX V 0 ĕттĕм .
SFX V 0 ĕттĕмччĕ .
SFX V р меттĕм .
SFX V р меттĕмччĕ .
SFX V 0 ĕттĕн .
SFX V 0 ĕттĕнччĕ .
SFX V р мĕттĕн .
SFX V р мĕттĕнччĕ .
SFX V 0 ĕччĕ .
SFX V р мĕччĕ .
SFX V 0 ĕттĕмĕр .
SFX V 0 ĕттĕмĕрччĕ .
SFX V р мĕттĕмĕр .
SFX V р мĕттĕмĕрччĕ .
SFX V 0 ĕттĕр .
SFX V 0 ĕттĕрччĕ .
SFX V р мĕттĕр .
SFX V р мĕттĕрччĕ .
SFX V 0 ĕччĕç .
SFX V р мĕччĕç .
SFX V 0 ĕпин .
SFX V р мĕпин .
SFX V 0 ĕсĕн .
SFX V р мĕсĕн .
SFX V 0 ин .
SFX V р мин .
SFX V 0 ĕпĕрин .
SFX V р мĕпĕрин .
SFX V 0 ĕсĕр .
SFX V р мĕсĕр .
SFX V 0 ĕçин .
SFX V р мĕçин .
SFX V 0 ем .
SFX V р тĕр .
SFX V 0 ер .
SFX V 0 ĕр .
SFX V р ччĕр .
SFX V р ме .
SFX V р месĕр .
SFX V р мешкĕн .
SFX V 0 екен/B .
SFX V р ни/B .
SFX V р менни/B .
SFX V 0 ес .
SFX V 0 есшĕн .
SFX V р нĕ .
SFX V р мелле .
SFX V 0 ен .
SFX V 0 се .
SFX V 0 сен .
SFX V 0 сессĕн .
SFX V р месен .
SFX V р месессĕн .
SFX V 0 е .
SFX V 0 иччен .
SFX V р миччен .
SFX V р мессерен .
SFX V р нĕçемĕн .

SFX W Y 136
SFX W 0 атăп .
SFX W р мастăп .
SFX W 0 атăн .
SFX W р мастăн .
SFX W 0 ать .
SFX W р масть .
SFX W 0 атпăр .
SFX W р мастпăр .
SFX W 0 атăр р
SFX W р мастăр .
SFX W 0 аççĕ .
SFX W р маççĕ .
SFX W 0 аятăп .
SFX W 0 аймастăп .
SFX W 0 аятăн .
SFX W 0 аймастăн .
SFX W 0 аять .
SFX W 0 аймасть .
SFX W 0 аятпăр .
SFX W 0 аймастпăр .
SFX W 0 аятăр .
SFX W 0 аймастăр .
SFX W 0 аяççĕ .
SFX W 0 аймаççĕ .
SFX W 0 ăп .
SFX W р мăп .
SFX W 0 ăн .
SFX W р мăн .
SFX W 0 ĕ .
SFX W р мĕ .
SFX W 0 ăпăр .
SFX W р мăпăр .
SFX W 0 ăр .
SFX W р мăр .
SFX W 0 ĕç .
SFX W р мĕç .
SFX W р тăм .
SFX W р марăм .
SFX W р тăн .
SFX W р марăн .
SFX W р чĕ .
SFX W р марĕ .
SFX W р тăмăр .
SFX W р марăмăр .
SFX W р тăр .
SFX W р марăр .
SFX W р чĕç .
SFX W р марĕç .
SFX W 0 аттăм .
SFX W 0 аттăмччĕ .
SFX W р мастăмччĕ .
SFX W р мастăм .
SFX W 0 аттăн .
SFX W 0 аттăнччĕ .
SFX W р мастăнччĕ .
SFX W р мастăн .
SFX W 0 атчĕ .
SFX W р мастчĕ .
SFX W 0 аттăмăр .
SFX W 0 аттăмăрччĕ .
SFX W р мастăмăрччĕ .
SFX W р мастăмăр .
SFX W 0 аттăр .
SFX W 0 аттăрччĕ .
SFX W р мастăрччĕ .
SFX W р мастăр .
SFX W 0 атчĕç .
SFX W р мастчĕç .
SFX W 0 саттăм .
SFX W 0 саттăмччĕ .
SFX W 0 саттăн .
SFX W 0 саттăнччĕ .
SFX W 0 саччĕ .
SFX W 0 саттăмăр .
SFX W 0 саттăмăрччĕ .
SFX W 0 саттăр .
SFX W 0 саттăрччĕ .
SFX W 0 саччĕç .
SFX W 0 ăттăм .
SFX W 0 ăттăмччĕ .
SFX W р мăттăм .
SFX W р мăттăмччĕ .
SFX W 0 ăттăн .
SFX W 0 ăттăнччĕ .
SFX W р мăттăн .
SFX W р мăттăнччĕ .
SFX W 0 ĕччĕ .
SFX W р мĕччĕ .
SFX W 0 ăттăмăр .
SFX W 0 ăттăмăрччĕ .
SFX W р мăттăмăр .
SFX W р мăттăмăрччĕ .
SFX W 0 ăттăр .
SFX W 0 ăттăрччĕ .
SFX W р мăттăр .
SFX W р мăттăрччĕ .
SFX W 0 ĕччĕç .
SFX W р мĕччĕç .
SFX W 0 ăпин .
SFX W р мăпин .
SFX W 0 ăсăн .
SFX W р мăсăн .
SFX W 0 ин .
SFX W р мин .
SFX W 0 ăпăрин .
SFX W р мăпăрин .
SFX W 0 ăсăр .
SFX W р мăсăр .
SFX W 0 ĕçин .
SFX W р мĕçин .
SFX W 0 ам .
SFX W р тăр .
SFX W 0 ар .
SFX W 0 ăр .
SFX W р ччăр .
SFX W р ма .
SFX W р масăр .
SFX W р машкăн .
SFX W 0 акан/A .
SFX W р ни/A .
SFX W р манни/A .
SFX W 0 ас .
SFX W 0 асшăн .
SFX W р нă .
SFX W р малла .
SFX W 0 ан .
SFX W 0 са .
SFX W 0 сан .
SFX W р масан .
SFX W 0 сассăн .
SFX W р масассăн .
SFX W 0 а .
SFX W 0 иччен .
SFX W р миччен .
SFX W р массерен .
SFX W р нăçемĕн .
