SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
Адыгея/O
Альпы/O
Анды/O
Апеннины/O
Арденны/O
Афины/O
Балканы/O
Барановичи/O
Богучаны/O
Боровичи/O
Вербилки/O
Вязники/O
Галатея/O
Гвинея/O
Гималаи/O
Данаиды/O
Каракумы/O
Карпаты/O
Кассиопея/O
Кижи/O
Кимры/O
Кириши/O
Кордильеры/O
Корея/O
Ливны/O
Луховицы/O
Люберцы/O
Медея/O
Пелагея/O
Печоры/O
Пиренеи/O
Плеяды/O
Салоники/O
Саяны/O
Сиракузы/O
Соловки/O
Сумы/O
Сухиничи/O
Фивы/O
Филиппины/O
Хибины/O
Химки/O
Холмогоры/O
Чебоксары/O
Челны/O
Черкассы/O
Черновцы/O
Черусти/O
Черёмушки/O
Яссы/O
аллея/O
ассамблея/O
бакалея/O
батарея/O
идея/O
кĕр/BV
кисея/O
кӳр/V
ливрея/O
лотерея/O
оранжерея/O
орхидея/O
пар/AW
пер/V
пыр/AW
тăр/W
фармакопея/O
шăр/W
эпопея/O
яр/HW
